dev/dout.nouns.shemp.dix
    <pardef n="ביו/ם__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מי</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מנו</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מך</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מך</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מכם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מכן</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מן</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מו</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מה</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מים</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מי</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיי</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מינו</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיך</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מייך</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיכם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיכן</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיהן</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיו</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיה</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מיהם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="קיו/ץ__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ץ</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ץ</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צי</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צנו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צכם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צכן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צה</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צים</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צי</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ציי</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צינו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ציך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צייך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ציכם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ציכן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ציהן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ציו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ציה</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ציהם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="כיו/ף__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ף</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ף</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פנו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פכם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פכן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פה</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פים</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פינו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פייך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיכם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיכן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיהן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיה</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיהם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="קימוץ"><i>קימו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רפרוף"><i>רפרו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חילוץ"><i>חילו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סינוף"><i>סינו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שימום"><i>שימו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עפעוף"><i>עפעו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גילום"><i>גילו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיקום"><i>מיקו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קידום"><i>קידו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גידוף"><i>גידו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תיפוף"><i>תיפו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זמזום"><i>זמזו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיפוץ"><i>קיפו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קרצוף"><i>קרצו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תמרוץ"><i>תמרו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תרגום"><i>תרגו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניאוף"><i>ניאו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניאוץ"><i>ניאו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זיהום"><i>זיהו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פחלוץ"><i>פחלו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיזוף"><i>שיזו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מינוף"><i>מינו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיזום"><i>פיזו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גילוף"><i>גילו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיסוף"><i>שיסו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניתוץ"><i>ניתו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיקוף"><i>שיקו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיקום"><i>שיקו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זיוף"><i>זיו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יישום"><i>יישו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ייסוף"><i>ייסו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בישום"><i>בישו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עקצוץ"><i>עקצו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סמלוץ"><i>סמלו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שפשוף"><i>שפשו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בצבוץ"><i>בצבו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיפוף"><i>גיפו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אסלום"><i>אסלו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סילוף"><i>סילו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עיקום"><i>עיקו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חימום"><i>חימו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פמפום"><i>פמפו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניחום"><i>ניחו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיחום"><i>פיחו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נצנוץ"><i>נצנו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ליפוף"><i>ליפו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיפוץ"><i>שיפו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיוץ"><i>קיו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיום"><i>קיו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צפצוף"><i>צפצו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיצוץ"><i>פיצו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="איסוף"><i>איסו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תירוץ"><i>תירו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דקלום"><i>דקלו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיוף"><i>שיו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סימום"><i>סימו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ייעוץ"><i>ייעו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כיפוף"><i>כיפו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דפדוף"><i>דפדו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אילוץ"><i>אילו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טיפוף"><i>טיפו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיטום"><i>פיטו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ריפוף"><i>ריפו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פרסום"><i>פרסו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיקוץ"><i>שיקו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גירוף"><i>גירו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טמטום"><i>טמטו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ביוץ"><i>ביו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ביום"><i>ביו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="המהום"><i>המהו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ריצוץ"><i>ריצו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עימום"><i>עימו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניפוף"><i>ניפו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כיווץ"><i>כיוו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ריחוף"><i>ריחו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מצמוץ"><i>מצמו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיצוץ"><i>קיצו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיהוץ"><i>גיהו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיבוץ"><i>קיבו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עמעום"><i>עמעו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חירוף"><i>חירו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פצפוץ"><i>פצפו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דימום"><i>דימו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיזום"><i>גיזו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שחלוף"><i>שחלו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיבוץ"><i>שיבו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ציוץ"><i>ציו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כרסום"><i>כרסו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שעמום"><i>שעמו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניפוץ"><i>ניפו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צירוף"><i>צירו</i><par n="כיו/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אימוץ"><i>אימו</i><par n="קיו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קימום"><i>קימו</i><par n="ביו/ם__n_m"/></e>
